src/morphology/affixes/regular_declinations.lexc
LEXICON M_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/m+A+Comp:»m MAGUS ;           ! suurem, elanum,  etc

LEXICON IM_DERIVATION
   @P.Der.im@ IM_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON IM_DERIVATION_SUF
      +Der/im+A+Superl:m MAGUS ;         ! suurim, elanuim, õnnelikem etc; NB! notice that » is missing!
!       +Der/im+A+Superl:m LT_DERIVATION ; ! suurimalt, elanuimalt, õnnelikemalt

LEXICON NNA_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ NNA_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON NNA_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/nna+N:»nna PERE ;             ! õpetajanna

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@@C.NeedNoun@ LANE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION_SUF
@U.Cap.Opt@@C.Cap@ LANE_DERIVATION_CAP ;         ! proper name must be downcased 

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION_CAP
            +Der/lane+N:»lane OLULINE ;          ! helveetslane etc

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.A@@C.NeedAdj@ LIK_DERIVATION_SUF ; ! the compounding algorithm needs a noun to be derived into adj,
                                            ! and this suffix satisfies its expectation

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION_SUF
@U.Cap.Opt@@C.Cap@ LIK_DERIVATION_CAP ;         ! proper name must be downcased

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION_CAP
            +Der/lik+A:»l´ik ELANIK ;           ! elajalik etc
            +Der/lik+A:»l´ikk US_DERIVATION ;  ! elajalikkus etc

LEXICON LINE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.A@@C.NeedAdj@ LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ; ! the compounding algorithm needs a noun to be derived into adj,
                                             ! and this suffix satisfies its expectation; end of story
LEXICON LINE_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/line+A:»line OLULINE ;          ! põõsaline etc

LEXICON KOND_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ KOND_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON KOND_DERIVATION_SUF
           +Der/kond+N:»k´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;  ! elajaskond etc
           +Der/kond+N:»konni TI_DERIVATION ;     ! elanikkonniti

LEXICON US_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.us@@C.NeedNoun@ US_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON US_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/us+N:»us OLULINE ;         ! elajalikkus, elavus, ...

LEXICON IST_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.ist@ IST_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON IST_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/ist+N:»ist TAUD ;         ! kapitalist

LEXICON LT_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ LT_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON LT_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/lt+Adv:»lt GI ;         ! derivation: suurelt, elanult, ...

LEXICON STI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ STI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON STI_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/sti+Adv:»sti GI ;        ! valusasti, kuuldavasti

LEXICON INI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ INI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON INI_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/ini+Adv:»ini GI ;        ! valusamini

LEXICON TI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ TI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON TI_DERIVATION_SUF
           +Der/ti+Adv:»ti GI ;        ! maakonniti

LEXICON KE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ KE_DERIVATION_SUF ;    ! P.Der.N is not correct always

LEXICON KE_DERIVATION_SUF
               +Dim/ke:»ke PEENIKE ;         ! suureke, majake, õpetajannake, ...

LEXICON SHORT_NE_STEM
    @P.Case.Short@ SHORT_NE_STEM_SUF ;

LEXICON SHORT_NE_STEM_SUF
            +Der/minus:»%- # ;                ! vaatamis-, astraal-

LEXICON KAS_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.kas@@C.NeedNoun@ KAS_DERIVATION_SUF ;    

LEXICON KAS_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/kas+N:»ka LOHAKAS ;         ! kolmekas

LEXICON NE_DERIVATION                        ! last part, currently only in compounds after POS.Num 
  @P.Der.A@@R.NeedDerNe@@C.NeedDerNe@ NE_DERIVATION_SUF ;    

LEXICON NE_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/ne+A:»ne SOOLANE ;         ! 5-autone
